Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5220.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3b. (1) The department shall, in consultation with the Michigan domestic and sexual violence prevention and treatment board and the Michigan Coalition to End Domestic and Sexual Violence, create comprehensive training materials for individuals who are required to report suspected child abuse or child neglect under section 3. within 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (2) An employer or organization that employs a mandatory reporter must provide the training materials described in subsection (1) to that employee. This subsection does not apply to an employer or organization that provides to an employee its own training that is updated annually based on the department's training materials described in subsection (1). (3) The department must make the training materials described in subsection (1) publicly available on its website in addition to any other form that the department chooses. (4) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, an individual required to report child abuse or child neglect under section 3 must complete, once every 3 years, training developed under this section. If an individual required to report child abuse or child neglect under section 3 completes continuing education that is based on the training described under subsection (1), the time period used to complete the continuing education will count toward the time period described under this subsection. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4530 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.